Hawaii statutes.
[§39A-359] Special purpose revenue bonds as
legal investments and lawful security. Special purpose revenue bonds
issued pursuant to this part shall be and are declared to be legal and
authorized investments for banks, savings banks, trust companies, savings and
loan associations, insurance companies, credit unions, fiduciaries, trustees,
guardians, and for all public funds of the State or other political
corporations or subdivisions of the State. The special purpose revenue bonds
shall be eligible to secure the deposit of any and all public funds of the
State and any and all public funds of counties or other political corporations
or subdivisions of the State, and the bonds shall be lawful and sufficient
security for public fund deposits to the extent of their value when accompanied
by all unmatured coupons appertaining thereto. [L 2012, c 147, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next